Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 5. SANITATION AND ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY

SUBTITLE C. AIR QUALITY

CHAPTER 387. AIR QUALITY RESEARCH SUPPORT PROGRAM

Sec. 387.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(2) "Program" means the air quality research support program established under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 967, Sec. 1(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 11, Sec. 4, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 28 (S.B. 527), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 387.002. AIR QUALITY RESEARCH SUPPORT PROGRAM. (a) The commission shall contract with a nonprofit organization or institution of higher education to establish and administer a program to support research related to air quality.

(b) The board of directors of a nonprofit organization establishing and administering the research program related to air quality under this chapter may not have more than 11 members, must include two persons with relevant scientific expertise to be nominated by the commission, and may not include more than four county judges selected from counties in the Houston-Galveston-Brazoria and Dallas-Fort Worth nonattainment areas. The two persons with relevant scientific expertise to be nominated by the commission may be employees or officers of the commission, provided that they do not participate in funding decisions affecting the granting of funds by the commission to a nonprofit organization on whose board they serve.

(c) The commission shall provide oversight as appropriate for grants provided under the program established under this chapter.

(d) A nonprofit organization or institution of higher education shall submit to the commission for approval a budget for the disposition of funds granted under the program established under this chapter.

(e) A nonprofit organization or institution of higher education shall be reimbursed for costs incurred in establishing and administering the research program related to air quality under this chapter. Reimbursable administrative costs of a nonprofit organization or institution of higher education may not exceed 10 percent of the program budget.

(f) A nonprofit organization that receives grants from the commission under this chapter is subject to Chapters 551 and 552, Government Code.

Redesignated and amended from Health and Safety Code, Section 387.010 by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 28 (S.B. 527), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 387.008. ENVIRONMENTAL RESEARCH FUND. (a) The environmental research fund is an account in the general revenue fund. The fund consists of money from gifts, grants, or donations to the fund for designated or general use and from any other source designated by the legislature.

(b) Money in the environmental research fund may be used only by the commission for operations and projects under this chapter.

(c) Sections 403.095 and 404.071, Government Code, do not apply to the fund. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 967, Sec. 1(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 29, Sec. 4, eff. May 14, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 11, Sec. 11, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Sec. 387.009. ADVISORY COMMITTEES. The commission may appoint advisory committees as necessary or desirable to assist the commission in performing its duties under this chapter. An advisory committee may include representatives of industry, environmental groups, consumer groups, local governments, agriculture, the commission, the General Land Office, and the Railroad Commission of Texas. Any senator or representative desiring to do so may participate on any advisory committee appointed under this section. Members of an advisory committee are not entitled to compensation.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 967, Sec. 1(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 11, Sec. 12, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.